District of Columbia statutes.
1-612.08

Approval of application for withdrawal.

(a)

The potential leave recipient’s personnel authority shall review an application to become a leave recipient under procedures established by the Mayor pursuant to § 1-612.11.

(b)

Before approving an application to become a leave recipient, the personnel authority shall determine that:

(1)

The request to become a leave recipient has been necessitated by a medical emergency;

(2)

The absence from duty because of the medical emergency is, or is expected to be, at least 10 workdays;

(3)

The potential leave recipient has previously donated a minimum of 4 hours of annual leave to the annual leave bank in the leave year in which the employee submits the application to become a leave recipient; and

(4)

The potential leave recipient does not possess accrued paid leave sufficient to cover the expected period of absence from work.

(c)

The value of the annual leave received by the leave recipient shall be in an amount equal to the hourly rate of pay of the leave recipient multiplied by the number of hours of annual leave received.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1208
as added Sept. 11, 1990, D.C. Law 8-155, § 2, 37 DCR 4159
This section is referenced in § 1-612.05.
1981 Ed., § 1-613.8.